Maryland, session 2026, SB0733.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0733*

SENATE BILL 733
1–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Adaptive reuse” means a change granted by a legislative body under § 4–207
of this article to the use restrictions in a zoning classification, as those restrictions are
applied to a particular improved property.
(C) “BOARD OF APPEALS” MEANS AN INDEPENDENT, QUASI–JUDICIAL BODY
THAT INTERPRETS AND APPLIES LOCAL ZONING, LICENSING, AND LAND–USE
ORDINANCES.
[(c)] (D) “Charter county” means a county that has adopted charter home rule
under Article XI–A of the Maryland Constitution.
[(d)] (E) “Code county” means a county that has adopted code home rule under
Article XI–F of the Maryland Constitution.
[(e)] (F) “County” means a county of the State or Baltimore City.
[(f)] (G) (1) “Development” means an activity that materially affects the
[existing] PHYSICAL condition [or use of any land or structure] OF LAND, WATER, OR AIR,
INCLUDING MODIFICATIONS TO STRUCTURES, UTILITIES, OR NATURAL FEATURES.
(2) “Development” does not include a normal agricultural activity.
(H) “DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS” MEANS THE RIGHTS TO USE, CONTROL,
PRESERVE, OR DEVELOP LAND, WHETHER OR NOT EXERCISED, AS AUTHORIZED BY
STATE OR LOCAL LAW OR APPLICABLE LAND USE OR ZONING REGULATIONS.
[(g)] (I) (1) “Legislative body” means the elected body of a local jurisdiction.
(2) “Legislative body” includes:
(i) the board of county commissioners;
(ii) the county council; and
(iii) the governing body of a municipal corporation.
[(h)] (J) (1) “Local executive” means the chief executive of a local jurisdiction.
(2) “Local executive” includes:
(i) the board of county commissioners;

SENATE BILL 733 3
(ii) the county executive;
(iii) the executive head; and
(iv) the mayor.
[(i)] (K) “Local jurisdiction” means a county or municipal corporation and the
territory within which its powers may be exercised.
[(j)] (L) (1) “Local law” means an enactment of the legislative body of a local
jurisdiction, whether by ordinance, resolution, or otherwise.
(2) “Local law” does not include a public local law.
(M) “PERMIT” MEANS AN OFFICIAL DOCUMENT OR AUTHORIZATION FROM A
STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT TO PERFORM A SPECIFIC DEVELOPMENT
ACTIVITY SUBJECT TO EXPIRATION DATES AND CERTAIN CONDITIONS FOR
APPROVAL, REVOCATION, AND RENEWAL.
[(k)] (N) “Person” means an individual, receiver, trustee, guardian, personal
representative, fiduciary, representative of any kind, partnership, firm, association,
corporation, limited liability company, or other entity.
[(l)] (O) (1) “Plan” means the policies, statements, goals, and interrelated
plans for private and public land use, transportation, and community facilities documented
in texts and maps that constitute the guide for an area’s future development.
(2) “Plan” includes a general plan, master plan, comprehensive plan,
functional plan, or community plan adopted in accordance with Subtitle 4 of this title and
Title 3 of this article.
[(m)] (P) “Priority funding area” has the meaning stated in § 5–7B–02 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
[(n)] (Q) (1) “Regulation” means a rule of general applicability and future
effect.
(2) “Regulation” includes a map or plan.
(R) “RESIDENT” MEANS A PERSON WHO EXERCISES THE RIGHT OF
OCCUPANCY OR LIVES IN A DWELLING UNIT LOCATED WITHIN A SPECIFIC ZONING
DISTRICT OR STATE OR LOCAL JURISDICTION THAT IS SUBJECT TO SPECIFIC LAWS,
ORDINANCES, AND CODES.
[(o)] (S) “Sensitive area” includes:

SENATE BILL 733
(1) a stream or wetland, and its buffers;
(2) a 100–year flood plain;
(3) a habitat of a threatened or endangered species;
(4) a steep slope;
(5) agricultural or forest land intended for resource protection or
conservation; and
(6) any other area in need of special protection, as determined in a plan.
[(p)] (T) “Special exception” means a grant of a specific use that:
(1) would not be appropriate generally or without restriction; and
(2) shall be based on a finding that:
(i) the requirements of the zoning law governing the special
exception on the subject property are satisfied; and
(ii) the use on the subject property is consistent with the plan and is
compatible with the existing neighborhood.
[(q)] (U) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, “state”
means:
(i) a state, possession, territory, or commonwealth of the United
States; or
(ii) the District of Columbia.
(2) When capitalized, “State” means Maryland.
[(r)] (V) (1) “Subdivision” means:
(i) the process and configuration of land by which one or more lots,
tracts, or parcels of land are divided, consolidated, or established as one or more lots or
parcels, or other divisions of land, consistent with criteria established by the legislative
body of the local jurisdiction; or
(ii) the land so subdivided.
(2) “Subdivision” includes resubdivision.

SENATE BILL 733 5
[(s)] (W) “Variance” means a modification only of density, bulk, dimensional, or
area requirements in the zoning law that is not contrary to the public interest, and where,
owing to conditions peculiar to the property and not because of any action taken by the
applicant, a literal enforcement of the zoning law would result in unnecessary hardship or
practical difficulty, as specified in the zoning law.
[(t)] (X) (1) “Zoning law” means the legislative implementation of
regulations for zoning by a local jurisdiction UNDER AUTHORITY GRANTED BY THIS
ARTICLE.
(2) “Zoning law” includes [a zoning ordinance, zoning regulation, zoning
code, and any similar legislative action to implement zoning controls in a local jurisdiction]
AN ORDINANCE, A REGULATION, A CODE, OR AN ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE FOR
PLANNING, PERMITTING, OR DECISION MAKING UNDER THIS ARTICLE.
4–301.
(a) [A] THE legislative body OF EACH LOCAL JURISDICTION shall [provide for
the appointment of] ESTABLISH a board of appeals.
(b) [The] A MEMBER OF A legislative body may not serve [as] ON the board of
appeals FOR THE LOCAL JURISDICTION FOR WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL IS A MEMBER
OF THE LEGISLATIVE BODY.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE MEMBERS OF A BOARD OF APPEALS SHALL BE APPOINTED BY:
(I) THE LEGISLATIVE BODY; OR
(II) THE PERSON DESIGNATED AS THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY
IN THE LOCAL LAW ESTABLISHING THE BOARD OF APPEALS.
(2) IF THERE IS A SINGLE ELECTED LOCAL EXECUTIVE, THE
MEMBERS OF THE BOARD OF APPEALS SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE LOCAL
EXECUTIVE AND CONFIRMED BY THE LEGISLATIVE BODY.
4–302.
(a) [A] EACH board of appeals [consists] SHALL CONSIST of at least three
members.
[(b) A member of a board of appeals shall be appointed by the local executive and
confirmed by the legislative body.]
[(c)] (B) The term of office of a member of a board of appeals is 3 years.

SENATE BILL 733
[(d) (1) A member of a board of appeals may be removed by the local executive
for:
(i) incompetence;
(ii) misconduct; or
(iii) in the same manner as for a member of a State board or
commission:
1. failure to attend meetings under § 8–501 of the State
Government Article; or
2. conviction of a crime in accordance with § 8–502 of the
State Government Article.
(2) The local executive shall provide to the member:
(i) a written statement of charges stating the grounds for removal;
and
(ii) an opportunity for a public hearing to contest the charges.
(e) The appointing authority shall appoint a new member to fill the unexpired
term of any member who leaves a board of appeals.
(f) (1) A legislative body shall designate one or more alternate members for
the board of appeals who may sit on the board when another member of the board is absent
or recused.
(2) When an alternate member is absent or recused, the legislative body
may designate a temporary alternate.]
4–302.1.
(A) A MEMBER OF A BOARD OF APPEALS MAY BE REMOVED BY THE LOCAL
EXECUTIVE IN THE MANNER PROVIDED UNDER § 8–502 OR § 10–1701 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE FOR THE REMOVAL OF A MEMBER OF A STATE BOARD OR
COMMISSION.
(B) THE LOCAL EXECUTIVE SHALL PROVIDE TO THE MEMBER:
(1) A WRITTEN STATEMENT OF CHARGES STATING THE GROUNDS FOR
REMOVAL; AND

SENATE BILL 733 7
(2) AN OPPORTUNITY FOR A PUBLIC HEARING TO CONTEST THE
CHARGES.
(C) THE APPOINTING AUTHORITY SHALL APPOINT A NEW MEMBER TO FILL
THE UNEXPIRED TERM OF ANY MEMBER WHO LEAVES A BOARD OF APPEALS.
(D) A LEGISLATIVE BODY SHALL DESIGNATE ONE OR MORE ALTERNATE
MEMBERS FOR THE BOARD OF APPEALS WHO MAY SIT ON THE BOARD WHEN
ANOTHER MEMBER OF THE BOARD IS ABSENT OR RECUSED.
(E) WHEN AN ALTERNATE MEMBER IS ABSENT OR RECUSED, THE
LEGISLATIVE BODY MAY DESIGNATE A TEMPORARY ALTERNATE.
[4–304.
(a) A board of appeals shall adopt rules in accordance with any local law adopted
under this division.
(b) A member of a board of appeals shall recuse himself or herself from
participating in a matter in which the member may have a conflict of interest or an
appearance of a conflict of interest.
(c) (1) (i) A board of appeals shall make a recording of all proceedings with
a contemporaneous written record showing the vote of each member on each question or
the member’s absence or failure to vote.
(ii) 1. A board of appeals shall immediately file the recording of
its proceedings in the office of the board.
2. The recording shall be a public record.
(2) If a recording or a transcript of a recording is not prepared in the normal
course of the board’s proceedings, the party who requests a copy of the recording or its
transcript shall pay the cost of preparing the recording or transcript.]
4–304.
A BOARD OF APPEALS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL:
(1) HEAR APPEALS CONCERNING ANY ORDER, REQUIREMENT,
IMPLEMENTATION MECHANISM, DECISION, OR DETERMINATION MADE BY AN
ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICER OR UNIT UNDER A LOCAL JURISDICTION’S ZONING
AUTHORITY, INCLUDING THE GRANTING OR DENYING OF A VARIANCE OR SPECIAL
EXCEPTION TO THE TERMS OF THE LAND USE LAWS, ORDINANCES, PROCEDURES, OR
REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS ARTICLE; AND

SENATE BILL 733
(2) RENDER FINDINGS AND DECISIONS ON APPEALS RELATED TO
ZONING, LICENSES, AND PERMITS AND EXECUTIVE, ADMINISTRATIVE, AND
ADJUDICATORY ORDERS.
[4–305.
A board of appeals may:
(1) hear and decide appeals when it is alleged that there is an error in any
order, requirement, decision, or determination made by an administrative officer or unit
under this division or of any local law adopted under this division;
(2) hear and decide special exceptions to the terms of a local law on which
the board is required to pass under the local law; and
(3) authorize on appeal in specific cases a variance from the terms of a local
law.]
4–305.
(A) A BOARD OF APPEALS SHALL ADOPT RULES IN ACCORDANCE WITH A
LOCAL LAW ADOPTED UNDER THIS DIVISION.
(B) A MEMBER OF A BOARD OF APPEALS SHALL RECUSE THEMSELVES FROM
PARTICIPATING IN A MATTER IN WHICH THE MEMBER MAY HAVE A CONFLICT OF
INTEREST OR AN APPEARANCE OF A CONFLICT OF INTEREST.
(C) (1) A BOARD OF APPEALS SHALL MAKE A RECORDING OF ALL
PROCEEDINGS WITH A CONTEMPORANEOUS WRITTEN RECORD SHOWING THE VOTE
OF EACH MEMBER ON EACH QUESTION OR THE MEMBER’S ABSENCE OR FAILURE TO
VOTE.
(2) (I) A BOARD OF APPEALS SHALL IMMEDIATELY FILE THE
RECORDING OF ITS PROCEEDINGS IN THE OFFICE OF THE BOARD.
(II) THE RECORDING SHALL BE A PUBLIC RECORD.
4–306.
(a) An appeal UNDER THIS TITLE OR TITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE to the board of
appeals may be filed by:
(1) a person OR RESIDENT aggrieved by a decision of the administrative
officer or unit; or

SENATE BILL 733 9
(2) an officer or unit of the jurisdiction affected by a decision of the
administrative officer or unit.
(b) A person OR RESIDENT shall file an appeal within[, a reasonable time] 30
DAYS AS provided by the rules [of] ADOPTED AND PUBLISHED BY the board of appeals
[by filing with the administrative officer or unit from whose action the appeal is taken and
with the board of appeals a notice of appeal specifying the grounds of the appeal].
(c) (1) [The administrative officer or unit from whose action the appeal is
taken shall transmit promptly to the board all papers constituting the record of the action
appealed] A NOTICE OF INTENT TO APPEAL SHALL BE FILED IN WRITING AND
TRANSMITTED TO THE BOARD OF APPEALS.
(2) THE NOTICE SHALL SPECIFY THE ORDER, REQUIREMENT,
IMPLEMENTATION MECHANISM, DECISION, OR DETERMINATION BEING APPEALED
AND THE GROUNDS OF THE APPEAL.
(3) THE BOARD OF APPEALS SHALL TRANSMIT THE NOTICE WITHIN 5
DAYS OF RECEIPT TO THE ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICER OR UNIT WHOSE ACTION IS
BEING APPEALED.
(d) [(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an] AN appeal
to a board of appeals stays all proceedings in furtherance of the [action] ORDER,
REQUIREMENT, IMPLEMENTATION MECHANISM, DECISION, OR DETERMINATION
BEING appealed.
[(2) If an administrative officer or unit certifies to the board of appeals facts
stated in the certificate that indicate to the administrative officer or unit that a stay would
cause imminent peril to life or property, the board of appeals or the circuit court may stay
the proceedings:
(i) only for good cause shown; and
(ii) through issuing a restraining order after notice is given to the
administrative officer or unit.]
(e) (1) A board of appeals shall:
(i) establish a reasonable time for the hearing of an appeal;
(ii) give public notice of the existence of the appeal and of the
hearing;

SENATE BILL 733
(iii) give due notice to the parties in interest and to other persons
entitled to notice under local law or the rules of the board of appeals; and
(iv) decide the appeal within a reasonable time.
(2) At a hearing, a party may:
(i) appear in person; or
(ii) be represented by an agent or attorney.
(f) [(1)] A board of appeals may, in conformity with this division:
[(i)] (1) wholly or partly reverse the order, requirement, or
decision that is the subject of the appeal; OR
[(ii)] (2) wholly or partly affirm the order, requirement, or decision
that is the subject of the appeal[;
(iii) modify the order, requirement, or decision that is the subject of
the appeal; or
(iv) issue a new order, requirement, or decision].
[(2) The board of appeals shall have all the powers of the administrative
officer or unit from whose action the appeal is taken.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.